Hawaii statutes.
§373-20 Penalties. Any employment
agency which violates this chapter is punishable upon conviction by a fine of
not more than $1,000, or imprisonment for not more than six months, or both. [L
1959, c 264, pt of §3; Supp, §88A-20; HRS §373-20]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next